Tennessee statutes. Title 41 Correctional Institutions and Inmates
Chapter 2

County Workhouses

41-2-101. Workhouses authorized.

The counties, through their county legislative bodies, are authorized and empowered to establish, construct and maintain portable, movable or stationary workhouses, as the legislative bodies may, in their discretion and wisdom, deem advisable for the best interest of the county. Prisoners receiving workhouse sentences by the circuit or criminal court of the county shall be sentenced to the workhouse as may be provided by the county legislative body.

The county legislative body may provide the lands, buildings and articles of any kind as may be necessary for a workhouse for the county.

The counties shall have the authority under subsection (a), this subsection (c) and § 41-2-103 to establish, construct and maintain portable or moving workhouses for the convenience of working prisoners upon the public highways and in working out their sentences in any labor assigned them.

Acts 1891, ch. 123, § 1; Acts 1907, ch. 445, §§ 1, 2; Shan., §§ 7398, 7399a1, 7399a2; Code 1932, §§ 12004, 12009, 12010; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 41-1201, 41-1203, 41-1204.

Cross-References. Corrections volunteer services, title 41, ch. 10.

Counselors for educational and correctional institutions, qualifications, § 8-50-105.

Road work by prisoners, § 41-2-123.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 8 Tenn. Juris., Costs § 14, 21 Tenn. Juris., Prisons and Prisoners, §§ 8, 9.

Law Reviews.

Liability of State Officials and Prison Corporations for Excessive Use of Force Against Inmates of Private Prisons, 40 Vand. L. Rev. 983 (1987).

Selected Tennessee Legislation of 1986, 54 Tenn. L. Rev. 457 (1987).

Attorney General Opinions. Requiring an inmate to prepay before being housed in a certain facility would violate the Equal Protection Clause of the United States Constitution, OAG 03-141, 2003 Tenn. AG LEXIS 162 (11/07/03).

An alternative facility is permissible, but only if it is operated pursuant to a contract approved by the county legislative body, OAG 03-141, 2003 Tenn. AG LEXIS 162 (11/07/03).

The use of alternative misdemeanor jail facilities may help eliminate overcrowding in a county jail, OAG 03-141, 2003 Tenn. AG LEXIS 162 (11/07/03).

41-2-102. Jail as workhouse.

Any county not having provided a separate workhouse may, through its county legislative body, declare its jail to be a workhouse, if the jail is, in the opinion of the members of the county legislative body, of sufficient capacity and suitable for the purpose. From and after the declaration the jail shall be known as, and shall be, the county workhouse, and the county shall have thereafter the benefit of all laws in the state applying to workhouses.

Acts 1891, ch. 123, § 2; Shan., § 7399; Code 1932, § 12005; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 36, 37; impl. am. Acts 1979, ch. 69, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 41-1202.

41-2-103. Sentence to county workhouse.

It is the duty of the judges of the circuit or criminal courts, whenever prisoners are convicted of any offense for which they are confined in the workhouse, to sentence the prisoners to the workhouse of the county, portable, movable or stationary, as may be provided and established in the county.

Acts 1907, ch. 445, § 3; Shan., § 7399a3; Code 1932, § 12011; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 41-1205.

41-2-104. Board of workhouse commissioners — Alternative administration.

When any county has established a separate workhouse, or the jail in any county has been declared a workhouse, the county legislative body of the county shall elect four (4) competent persons, who, in conjunction with the county mayor, shall be known as the board of workhouse commissioners, of which the county mayor shall be, ex officio, chair of the board.

Two (2) of the commissioners shall serve for the term of one (1) year and two (2) for the term of two (2) years; and annually thereafter, on the first Monday in January, the county legislative body shall elect two (2) commissioners for the term of two (2) years, and all vacancies shall be filled by like election for the unexpired term of the commissioner whose place is to be supplied.

The workhouse commissioners shall take an oath faithfully to discharge and perform the duties of their office, which oath shall be filed with the county clerk, and a record of the oath made on the minutes of the county legislative body. They shall appoint one (1) of their number secretary.

Where a separate workhouse has been established, the commissioners shall have charge, supervision and control of the workhouse in all of its departments, the inmates, the appointment or selection of a superintendent of the workhouse, all necessary guards and other employees, the discharging thereof at any time, in the discretion of the commissioners, and generally to regulate and control that department of the county's business.

The board of commissioners shall:

Meet once each month, and more often if necessary, for the transaction of business, at the office of the county mayor;

Keep, in a well-bound book to be furnished by the county, full and complete minutes of their proceedings;

Examine all accounts submitted to them by the superintendent, approve the accounts if found correct, and enter them on their minutes, showing from whom supplies were furnished, and for what purpose, and the amount. The chair and secretary shall sign the accounts, and deliver them to the county mayor, who shall issue a warrant for their payment, and keep a record of the accounts, designating to whom issued, and for what purpose, and shall preserve the vouchers; and

Visit and inspect the workhouse prisoners, where at work, as often as necessary.

Three (3) members of the board shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business.

The board of commissioners shall each receive such compensation as may be fixed by the county legislative body, to be paid quarterly upon warrant of the executive.

As an alternative to a board of workhouse commissioners, any county may, upon the recommendation of the county mayor and a resolution passed by a two-thirds (2/3) vote of the county legislative body, place the operation, supervision and control of the county workhouse under the administrative control of the county mayor. If a county chooses the alternative provided by this subdivision (h)(1)(A), the county mayor shall possess the same powers, duties and responsibilities as are provided by this section for the board of workhouse commissioners.

As a further alternative to a board of workhouse commissioners, any county may, upon recommendation by the county mayor, and by resolution of the county legislative body, place the operation, supervision and control of the county workhouse under the administrative control of the county sheriff. Administrative control of the workhouse shall be subject to such terms and conditions as the county legislative body and the sheriff may agree. Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, the agreement between the county legislative body and the sheriff may provide for the payment of additional compensation to the sheriff for the services. If a county chooses this further alternative as provided in this subdivision (h)(1)(B), the sheriff shall possess the same powers, duties and responsibilities as are provided by this section for the board of workhouse commissioners, unless otherwise provided by the agreement between the county legislative body and the sheriff.

Subdivision (h)(1) shall not apply in any county having a population of not less than three hundred nineteen thousand six hundred twenty-five (319,625) nor more than three hundred nineteen thousand seven hundred twenty-five (319,725), according to the 1980 federal census or any subsequent federal census.

Acts 1891, ch. 123, §§ 3, 5, 6; Shan., §§ 7400-7402, 7404, 7406, 7408; Code 1932, §§ 12012-12015, 12017, 12019; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 16, 22, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 41-1206 — 41-1211; Acts 1984, ch. 855, § 1; 1988, ch. 861, § 1; 1997, ch. 100, § 1; 2003, ch. 90, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. For table of U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2, directed the code commission to change all references from “county executive” to “county mayor” and to include all such changes in supplements and replacement volumes for the Tennessee Code Annotated.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 8 Tenn. Juris., Counties, § 23.

41-2-105. Labor prescribed for prisoners.

The board of workhouse commissioners shall prescribe the kind of labor at which the prisoners shall be put; provided, that when practicable, they shall be worked on the county roads in preference to all other kinds of labor.

Acts 1891, ch. 123, § 5; Shan., § 7405; Code 1932, § 12016; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 41-1212.

Cross-References. Felons to work on roads when practicable, § 41-2-123.

41-2-106. Quarterly audit.

The board of workhouse commissioners shall, at the close of each quarter, at least two (2) days before the meeting of the county legislative body, submit the book kept by the superintendent and the minute book of the board to the county mayor, for settlement and comparison with the audited account kept in the county mayor's office; and, if found correct, the county mayor shall endorse on the books “examined and approved” and sign the books officially.

Acts 1891, ch. 123, § 6; Shan., § 7407; Code 1932, § 12018; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 16, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 41-1213; Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2, directed the code commission to change all references from “county executive” to “county mayor” and to include all such changes in supplements and replacement volumes for the Tennessee Code Annotated.

41-2-107. Workhouse superintendents.

The board of commissioners shall appoint a superintendent of the workhouse.

The superintendent shall be appointed on the first Monday in January of every even-numbered year, and hold office for two (2) years, unless sooner suspended or removed, as provided in § 41-2-104(d).

The superintendent shall take an oath, and give bond for the faithful discharge of the superintendent's duty, with two (2) or more approved sureties, or an approved surety company, in the sum of one thousand dollars ($1,000), payable to the state for the use of the county, before the county mayor, which oath and bond shall be filed with the county clerk, and record of the oath and bond made on the minutes of the county legislative body.

The salary of the superintendent shall be fixed by the commissioners and shall be paid quarterly on the warrant of the county mayor.

Acts 1891, ch. 123, § 7; Shan., §§ 7409, 7410; mod. Code 1932, §§ 12020, 12021; modified; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 16, 22, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 41-1214, 41-1216; Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2, directed the code commission to change all references from “county executive” to “county mayor” and to include all such changes in supplements and replacement volumes for the Tennessee Code Annotated.

Cross-References. Superintendents, appointment and salary, §§ 4-6-103, 4-6-104.

41-2-108. Sheriff as superintendent.

Whenever the jail in any county has been declared a workhouse, as provided in § 41-2-102, the sheriff shall be ex officio the superintendent of the workhouse. All persons liable to imprisonment for safekeeping, whether charged with felonies or misdemeanors, shall be confined in the workhouse, securely kept and properly cared for.

Acts 1891, ch. 123, §§ 10, 11; Shan., § 7415; mod. Code 1932, § 12024; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 41-1215.

Cross-References. Service of jail or workhouse sentences on nonconsecutive days, § 40-20-117.

Law Reviews.

The New Tennessee Code (Charles C. Trabue), 10 Tenn. L. Rev. 155 (1932).

41-2-109. Care of prisoners.

It is the duty of the superintendent to:

Discharge each prisoner as soon as the prisoner's time is out, or upon order of the board of commissioners;

See that the prisoners are properly guarded to prevent escape;

See that they are kindly and humanely treated, and properly provided with clothing, wholesome food properly cooked and prepared for eating three (3) times a day when at work;

See that they are warmly and comfortably housed at night and in bad weather;

See that when sick they have proper medicine and medical treatment, and, in case of death, are decently buried; and

Keep the males separate from the females.

Acts 1891, ch. 123, § 8; Shan., § 7411; Code 1932, § 12022; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 41-1217.

Cross-References. Regulation and care of inmates, title 41, ch. 21, part 2.

Sanitary inspections, § 4-3-1803.

Attorney General Opinions. Constitutionality of using prison labor wearing leg irons, OAG 98-083, 1998 Tenn. AG LEXIS 83 (4/13/98).

41-2-110. Accounts and reports.

The superintendent shall keep or cause to be kept, in a well-bound book to be furnished by the county, an account of all supplies, implements and tools purchased for the workhouse, keeping the account for supplies separate from implements and tools.

The superintendent shall, when a purchase is made, obtain an itemized bill specifying from whom purchased, the kind and amount of the articles purchased and the date.

The superintendent shall approve the bill, enter it on the books and present it to the commissioners for their approval.

The superintendent shall make to the commissioners quarterly reports of the whole working system, the amount of the work done and its estimated value, the amount of current expenses for supplies and for tools and implements and any other matter deemed necessary by the superintendent or ordered by the commissioners or the county legislative body.

Acts 1891, ch. 123, § 9; Shan., § 7412; Code 1932, § 12023; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 41-1218.

Law Reviews.

Tennessee Civil Disabilities: A Systemic Approach (Neil P. Cohen), 41 Tenn. L. Rev. 253 (1975).

41-2-111. Sentence to hard labor — Good time credit — Disciplinary review board.

In all cases where a person is by law liable to be imprisoned in the county jail for punishment or for failure to pay a fine, that person shall be sentenced to be confined, and shall be confined, at hard labor in the county workhouse until the expiration of the sentence of imprisonment or, subject to the limitations imposed by § 40-24-104, until the fine has been worked out, paid or secured to be paid.

Each such prisoner who has been sentenced to the county jail or workhouse for any period of time less than one (1) year on either a misdemeanor or a felony, and who behaves uprightly, shall have deducted from the sentence imposed by the court time equal to one quarter (¼) of the sentence. In calculating the amount of good time credit earned, the one-quarter reduction shall apply to the entire sentence, including pretrial and post-trial confinement. Fractions of a day's credit for good time of one half (½) or more shall be considered a full day's credit. If any prisoner violates the rules and regulations of the jail or workhouse, or otherwise behaves improperly, the sheriff or superintendent of the institution may revoke all or any portion of the prisoner's good time credit; provided, that the prisoner is given a hearing in accordance with due process before a disciplinary review board and is found to have violated the rules and regulations of the institution.

The disciplinary review board for each institution shall be composed of six (6) impartial members, one (1) or more of whom may be members of the jail or workhouse staff.

The members of the disciplinary review board, which is created by this section, shall be appointed by the sheriff or superintendent of the jail or workhouse where the institution is located, subject to approval by the county legislative body.

Members shall serve for a period of two (2) years, except that appointments made to fill unexpired terms shall be for the period of the unexpired terms.

No less than one (1) and no more than three (3) of the members of the disciplinary review board are required to transact the business authorized by this section.

The county legislative body is authorized to establish the rate of compensation for such board members. In any county having a population of more than seven hundred thousand (700,000) according to the 1980 federal census or any subsequent federal census, this subsection (c) shall not apply.

Members of the board, while acting in good faith, shall not be subject to civil liability relative to the performance of duties delegated to the board by this section.

The prisoner shall be given notice of the disciplinary hearing and shall have the right to call witnesses in the prisoner's behalf. The decisions of the disciplinary review board for workhouse inmates may be appealed to the sheriff or workhouse superintendent.

Acts 1891, ch. 123, § 12; Shan., § 7417; Code 1932, § 12026; Acts 1967, ch. 103, § 1; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 16, 36; 1982, ch. 940, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 41-1219; Acts 1986, ch. 744, §§ 4-9; 1995, ch. 315, § 1; 2005, ch. 307, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. For table of U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

Cross-References. Collection and settlement of costs and fines, §§ 40-24-102 — 40-24-107.

Textbooks. Tennessee Criminal Practice and Procedure (Raybin), § 32.125.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 8 Tenn. Juris., Criminal Procedure, §§ 52, 54.

Law Reviews.

Tennessee Civil Disabilities: A Systemic Approach (Neil P. Cohen), 41 Tenn. L. Rev. 253 (1974).

Attorney General Opinions. Sentence credits for inmates of county jails and workhouses, OAG 96-061, 1996 Tenn. AG LEXIS 68 (4/4/96).

Sentence credits for the offense of driving under the influence of an intoxicant, OAG 99-158, 1999 Tenn. AG LEXIS 150 (8/19/99).

Sentence credits pursuant to § 41-2-111 for inmates in county jails or workhouses, OAG 00-051, 2000 Tenn. AG LEXIS 51 (3/20/00).

Notwithstanding 41-2-111(b), there is no authority for a court to impose a day-for-day sentence following probation revocation. OAG 02-125, 2002 Tenn. AG LEXIS 130 (11/25/2002)

Good-time credits mandated by subsection (b) of this section apply only to post-sentence detention, not to pre-sentence detention, OAG 03-166, 2003 Tenn. AG LEXIS 177 (12/23/03).

41-2-112. Fine accompanying sentence to workhouse.

When any person is sentenced to the workhouse, the judge of the court trying the case shall fix the fine in each case against the prisoner at a sum equal to the state and county tax provided by law; provided, that a greater fine may be entered, in the discretion of the court.

Acts 1891, ch. 123, § 13; Shan., § 7418; Code 1932, § 12027; impl. am. Acts 1979, ch. 68, § 3; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 41-1220.

41-2-113. Sentence to workhouse in lieu of jail.

In all cases where a person is by law liable to be imprisoned in the county jail for safekeeping or punishment, confinement in the workhouse, if one is provided, may, in the discretion of the court, be substituted.

Code 1858, § 5413; Shan., § 7393; Code 1932, § 12006; impl. am. Acts 1979, ch. 68, § 3; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 41-1221.

Cross-References. Probation coupled with periodic confinement, § 40-35-307.

Split confinement, § 40-35-306.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 21 Tenn. Juris., Prisons and Prisoners, §§ 2, 8.

41-2-114, 41-2-115.
[Reserved.]

A certified statement of the sentence of each prisoner shall be made out on printed blanks provided for the purpose and delivered to the superintendent of the workhouse and to the county mayor by the clerk of the court trying the case and shall specify:

The name of the inmate;

Date of sentence;

Crime for which committed;

The term of imprisonment; and

Amount of fine and costs; and the superintendent and the county mayor shall enter the amount in a book provided by the county for that purpose.

The superintendent shall also keep a record of the age, sex, complexion, color of the hair and eyes and nationality of each inmate.

Acts 1891, ch. 123, § 15; Shan., § 7420; Code 1932, § 12029; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 16, 36; impl. am. Acts 1979, ch. 68, § 3; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 41-1224; Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2, directed the code commission to change all references from “county executive” to “county mayor” and to include all such changes in supplements and replacement volumes for the Tennessee Code Annotated.

Cross-References. Records of inmates, § 4-6-140.

41-2-117. Workhouse sentence beginning after term in penitentiary.

When any inmate is sentenced by the courts to the workhouse, the inmate's time of sentence to begin after a term of imprisonment in the penitentiary has expired, the judge of the court shall, in the commitment to the penitentiary, cause this fact to appear and shall direct the warden of the penitentiary to notify the superintendent of the workhouse of the time when the inmate will be discharged. It is the warden's duty to deliver the inmate upon the order of the superintendent.

Acts 1891, ch. 123, § 14; Shan., § 7419; Code 1932, § 12028; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 41-1225.

41-2-118. Medical care of prisoners.

Where any county has a health officer and jail physician, the person shall attend on all workhouse prisoners while they remain in the jail building after sentence to the workhouse and give them medicine and medical treatment as may be necessary. The health officer and physician shall receive no additional compensation for the services other than the person's regular salary.

Where there is no health officer and jail physician, the county may contract for services with a private physician.

Acts 1891, ch. 123, § 21; Shan., § 7427; Code 1932, § 12036; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 41-1226; Acts 1986, ch. 744, § 11.

Cross-References. Medical and dental care, §§ 4-6-109 — 4-6-113.

41-2-119. Board for state prisoners.

The state shall pay for the board of state prisoners in accordance with chapter 8 of this title.

Within the time requirements of § 41-8-106, the number of prisoners held and bills for the same shall be made out and sworn to by the sheriff or superintendent and certified by the clerk.

Acts 1891, ch. 123, § 11; Shan., § 7416; Code 1932, § 12025; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 16, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 41-1227; Acts 1986, ch. 744, § 12.

Compiler's Notes. This section may be affected by § 9-1-116, concerning entitlement to funds, absent appropriation.

41-2-120. Refusal to work or disorderly conduct.

Any prisoner refusing to work or becoming disorderly may be confined in solitary confinement, or subjected to such other punishment, not inconsistent with humanity, as may be deemed necessary by the sheriff or superintendent for the control of the prisoners, including reducing sentence credits pursuant to the procedure established in § 41-2-111.

Prisoners refusing to work, or while in solitary confinement, shall receive no credit for the time so spent.

Acts 1891, ch. 123, § 17; Shan., § 7422; Code 1932, § 12032; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 41-1228; Acts 1986, ch. 744, § 13.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 21 Tenn. Juris., Prisons and Prisoners, § 9.

Law Reviews.

Tennessee Civil Disabilities: A Systemic Approach (Neil P. Cohen), 41 Tenn. L. Rev. 253 (1974).

41-2-121. Transfer to department of correction.

Whenever the sheriff or superintendent in charge of the county workhouse or penal farm determines that a prisoner who is convicted and sentenced to the workhouse or penal farm under § 40-23-104, § 40-35-314 or former § 40-35-311 proves to be a troublemaker or does not adjust to the proper type of operation of the workhouse or penal farm and creates a problem, the sheriff or superintendent may then present to the court that ordered the prisoner confined in the county workhouse or penal farm for the term of such sentence a petition setting forth the reasons why, in the officer's opinion, an order should be entered transferring the prisoner from the county workhouse or penal farm to the department of correction.

A copy of the petition shall be served upon the prisoner by the sheriff and the prisoner then brought before the court to show cause why the prisoner should not be transferred from the county workhouse or penal farm to the department to serve out the term in the department in conformity with the allegations and prayer of the petition before the court. If the judge of the court that ordered the prisoner confined in the county workhouse or penal farm for the term of such sentence is not immediately available due to death, illness, recess or any other reason, the petition may be presented to and acted upon by any other judge of a court of equal or concurrent jurisdiction.

Acts 1947, ch. 5, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, § 11793; modified; Acts 1967, ch. 272, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 41-1229; Acts 1986, ch. 744, §§ 14-16.

Compiler's Notes. The reference in this section to former § 40-35-311 is apparently a reference to the version of § 40-35-311 in effect prior to November 1, 1989, when that section was repealed and replaced with different provisions.

41-2-122. Transfer to state psychiatric hospital.

Whenever the sheriff or superintendent or other official in charge of the county workhouse or penal farm determines that a prisoner convicted and sentenced to the workhouse or penal farm requires hospitalization for treatment of a mental illness, that official may seek the admission of the prisoner to a state psychiatric hospital under § 33-6-201, title 33, chapter 6, part 4 or title 33, chapter 6, part 5.

A prisoner from a workhouse or penal farm who is admitted to a state psychiatric hospital under § 33-6-201, title 33, chapter 6, part 4 or title 33, chapter 6, part 5 shall be returned to the workhouse or penal farm whenever the superintendent of the hospital determines that the prisoner no longer meets the standards under which the prisoner was admitted or when continued hospitalization is no longer advisable or beneficial.

Acts 1947, ch. 5, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, § 11793; modified; Acts 1967, ch. 164, § 1; 1977, ch. 387, § 3; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 41-1230; Acts 1986, ch. 744, § 17; 2000, ch. 947, §§ 8A, 8C, 8E.

41-2-123. Road work by prisoners — Credit for time worked — Grants for litter abatement — Governmental immunity.

All prisoners sentenced to the county workhouse under § 40-23-104 or former § 40-35-311 shall be worked on the county roads under the supervision of the chief administrative officer of the county highway department, when, in the opinion of the chief administrative officer, a sufficient number are available to pay the county for the necessary expense incurred for keeping and caring for them. The prisoners may be utilized by municipalities within the county by mutual agreement between the county sheriff or superintendent of the county workhouse and the chief executive officer of the municipality.

When any prisoner has been sentenced to imprisonment in a county workhouse or county jail for a period not to exceed eleven (11) months and twenty-nine (29) days, the sheriff of the county or the superintendent of the county workhouse, or both, are authorized to permit the prisoner to work on the county roads or within municipalities within the county on roads, parks, public property, public easements or alongside public waterways up to a maximum of fifty feet (50') from the shoreline.

It is the duty of the prisoners to pick up and collect litter, trash and other miscellaneous items unsightly to the public that have accumulated on the county roads. All prisoners participating in this work program shall be under the supervision of the county sheriff or the sheriff's representative or the superintendent of the county workhouse or the superintendent's representative. Prisoners utilized by a municipality shall be supervised by representatives of the municipality. The prisoners may be utilized by the municipalities for such duties or manual labor as the municipality deems appropriate.

Work performed by the prisoner under this subsection (b) shall be credited toward reduction of the prisoner's sentence in the following manner: for each one (1) day worked on the road by the prisoner, the prisoner's sentence shall be reduced by two (2) days.

The commissioner of transportation is authorized to make grants to the several counties of the state, either through the office of sheriff or that of county mayor, or other appropriate official, for the purpose of funding programs for the collection of litter and trash along county, state and interstate roads and highways within the respective counties. The grants may provide for the use of labor of prisoners sentenced to the county workhouse and may fund expenses, including, but not limited to, salaries, administration and the purchase, maintenance and operation of equipment. Not more than ten percent (10%) of the funds awarded by a grant under this subsection (c) shall be expended for the purpose of advertising or promoting a litter and trash collection program, and no part of such funds shall be used to purchase supplies, materials or equipment displaying the name or likeness of the administrator of such program or of any other individual. Local county officials and other recipients may submit applications outlining a plan for litter abatement, which may include recycling programs, to the department of transportation. All applications shall be subject to prior review and approval by the governor or designated agent.

Neither the state nor any municipality, county or political subdivision of the state, nor any employee or officer thereof, shall be liable to any person for the acts of any prisoner while on a work detail, while being transported to or from a work detail, while attempting an escape from a work detail or after escape from a work detail.

Except as provided in § 9-8-307, neither the state nor any municipality, county or political subdivision of the state, nor any employee or officer thereof, shall be liable to any prisoner or prisoner's family for death or injuries received while on a work detail, other than for medical treatment for the injury during the period of the prisoner's confinement.

Acts 1915, ch. 107, § 2; Shan., § 7207a2; Code 1932, § 11794; modified; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 16, 36; Acts 1979, ch. 249, §§ 1, 2; 1981, ch. 93, §§ 1, 2; 1981, ch. 290, § 1; 1981, ch. 307, § 4; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 41-1231; Acts 1983, ch. 98, §§ 1-5; 1986, ch. 744, §§ 18, 19; 1989, ch. 511, § 2; 2003, ch. 90, § 2; 2004, ch. 907, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. The reference in this section to § 40-35-311 is apparently a reference to the version of that section prior to November 1, 1989, when that section was repealed and replaced with different provisions.

Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2, directed the code commission to change all references from “county executive” to “county mayor” and to include all such changes in supplements and replacement volumes for the Tennessee Code Annotated.

Cross-References. Certain prisoners in local jail or workhouses, release on work-related program, § 41-2-147.

Road work by jail prisoners, title 41, ch. 22, part 3.

Use of prison labor by department of transportation, § 54-5-128.

Volunteer prisoner work program, title 4, ch. 6, part 2.

Law Reviews.

Selected Tennessee Legislation of 1983 (N. L. Resener, J. A. Whitson, K. J. Miller), 50 Tenn. L. Rev. 785 (1983).

Attorney General Opinions. Board of probation and parole has no authority to remove sentence credits earned in local jail or workhouse pursuant to T.C.A. §§ 41-2-123, 41-2-146, 41-2-147 or 41-21-236, OAG 05-031, 2005 Tenn. AG LEXIS 31, (3/29/05).

41-2-124. Work contracts with other counties.

Any county not desiring to work its workhouse prisoners may, through its county mayor, by direction of the county legislative body, contract with any other county for the custody and employment of such prisoners. The prisoners shall then be worked and guarded by the county contracting to take them and shall be subject to any rules that may be established by the workhouse commissioners of that county.

Acts 1891, ch. 123, § 22; Shan., § 7428; Code 1932, § 12037; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 16, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 41-1232; Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2, directed the code commission to change all references from “county executive” to “county mayor” and to include all such changes in supplements and replacement volumes for the Tennessee Code Annotated.

41-2-125. Contracts with department of transportation.

The department of transportation is authorized to enter into and make such contracts as may be deemed advisable by the department, with county officials charged by law to work workhouse prisoners in the construction or reconstruction of roads and to compensate such counties by allowing credit to the county in cooperating in the construction or reconstruction of roads with the department, for the state or federal government, upon such terms as may be approved by the appropriate department of the government of the United States and the Tennessee department of transportation.

Acts 1917, ch. 40, § 3; Shan., § 7581a22; impl. am. Acts 1923, ch. 7, §§ 1, 33; Code 1932, § 12204; modified; impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 3; impl. am. Acts 1972, ch. 829, § 7; impl. am. Acts 1981, ch. 264, § 12; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 41-1233.

Cross-References. Use of prison labor by department of transportation, § 54-5-128.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 8 Tenn. Juris., Criminal Procedure, § 54.

41-2-126. Contract to bail out prisoner — Surrender of prisoner by bailee — Action against delinquent bailee.

Any person, after sentence of punishment by imprisonment of any prisoner has expired, may, by contract with the workhouse commissioners and with the consent of the prisoner, bail out any prisoner, under the following form and conditions:

State of Tennessee,

County of .

I, , principal, and , sureties, do hereby agree to pay the State of Tennessee, for the use of county, the sum of dollars, in monthly installments of dollars, to be paid on the day of each month, until the whole is paid, this being the amount for which is confined in the county workhouse. agrees to be bailed out of the workhouse by above parties, and agrees to work out or pay the amount above specified as therein stated, at the office of the county mayor. Should fail to do so, then is liable to be arrested and delivered to the superintendent of the workhouse, to work out any balance unpaid and the costs of the arrest. In case of default and arrest, the bailee is only liable for the amount falling due prior to the arrest.

This day of , 20 .

The prisoner, while so bailed, shall be in the hands of the bailee, who may, at any time, surrender and turn over the prisoner to the superintendent of the workhouse and shall be discharged from further liability on the contract; provided, that the bailee shall pay into the county treasury, on receivable warrant of the county mayor, the amount falling due by the terms of the contract prior to the surrender of the prisoner.

The bailee shall have the power to arrest the prisoner in person or through any sheriff or constable anywhere in the state; and the prisoner, when arrested, shall be delivered to the superintendent of the workhouse and shall be compelled to work out such part of the original fine and costs as have not been worked out or paid by the prisoner under the agreement and the costs of the arrest in addition.

If the bailee fails to pay the fine and costs, or costs only, according to the agreement, then the county mayor shall, in the name of the state, for the use of the county, proceed against the bailee and the sureties before any general sessions or circuit court.

Acts 1891, ch. 123, §§ 19, 20; Shan., §§ 7424-7426; Code 1932, §§ 12033-12035; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 16, 36; impl. am. Acts 1979, ch. 68, § 3; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 41-1234 — 41-1236; Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2, directed the code commission to change all references from “county executive” to “county mayor” and to include all such changes in supplements and replacement volumes for the Tennessee Code Annotated.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 4 Tenn. Juris., Bail and Recognizance, § 4; 8 Tenn. Juris., Criminal Procedure, § 54.

41-2-127. Release of prisoners for occupational, scholastic or medical purposes.

Counties having a population of six hundred thousand (600,000) or more, according to the 1960 federal census or any subsequent federal census, shall permit certain prisoners to leave the workhouse or jail during reasonable and necessary hours for occupational, scholastic or medical purposes as provided in §§ 41-2-127 — 41-2-132.

All other counties of this state are authorized to permit certain prisoners to leave the workhouse or jail during reasonable and necessary hours for occupational, scholastic or medical purposes as provided in §§ 41-2-127 — 41-2-132.

Acts 1967, ch. 259, § 1; 1972, ch. 626, § 1; T.C.A., § 41-1237.

Compiler's Notes. For table of U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

Cross-References. Roster of inmate release privileges, title 41, ch. 21, part 7.

Textbooks. Tennessee Forms (Robinson, Ramsey and Harwell), No. 3-32-4.

Law Reviews.

Imprisonment for Nonpayment of Fines and Costs: A New Look at the Law and the Constitution (Paul M. Stein), 22 Vand. L. Rev. 611 (1969).